Kentucky statutes. TITLE XV Roads, Waterways, And Aviation
Railroad Crossings

177.110.
Railroad crossings — Construction of KRS 177.120 to 177.210.

The provisions of KRS

177.120

to

177.210

shall not apply to any railroad lines or tracks constructed across primary roads after March 23, 1926.

Where railroad lines or tracks constructed after March 23, 1926 cross any primary road, the department shall determine the character of the crossing to be constructed by the railroad company, and the cost of such crossings shall be paid for by the railroad company.

History.

4356z-9.

Research References and Practice Aids

Kentucky Law Journal.

Richardson, Acquisition of Right of Way for Highway Purposes in Kentucky — Right of Eminent Domain and Just Compensation, 36 Ky. L.J. 159 (1948).

177.120.
Department may order elimination of grade crossings or substitution — Standards to be set by administrative regulations — Closure of grade crossings.

Whenever the department considers it necessary for the public safety, it may order any railroad company owning or operating a railroad in this state, to eliminate any grade crossing or change any existing overhead or underpass structure where any public road crosses the railroad tracks of the company. The department may determine whether a substitute crossing should be established and if so, the location of the crossing to be substituted, and whether it shall pass over or under the railroad tracks or intersect them at grade.

In accordance with this section, the department shall promulgate administrative regulations by December 1, 1992, that contain standards governing the closure of public grade crossings. In adopting standards, the department shall request and consider written comments from affected local governments and shall consider that the number of redundant and inherently dangerous grade crossings in this state should be reduced and that public safety will be enhanced by reducing the number of redundant and inherently dangerous grade crossings.

On or before July 1, 1993, and on or before July 1 of each of the next four (4) years, and as necessary thereafter, the department shall compose a list of grade crossings proposed to be closed. The list shall be developed by applying the standards set forth in the administrative regulations adopted under subsection (2) of this section. Grade crossings that are part of an abandonment, closing, or removal shall not be included in the list. The department shall notify the public officials having the necessary authority and the railway companies operating the railroads of the proposed closures. Either affected party may request a public hearing, and if requested, the department shall hold a public hearing and apply in its determination the information gained at the public hearing and administrative regulations developed under subsection (2) of this section. If after the hearing the department determines that closure is warranted, it may order the crossing closed.

If a request for a hearing on a particular crossing is not received within thirty (30) days of notice of the opportunity for a public hearing advertised pursuant to the requirements of KRS Chapter 424, the department shall order the crossing closed.

History.

4356z-1; 4356z-10; 1992, ch. 229, § 6, effective July 14, 1992; 1994, ch. 195, § 2, effective July 15, 1994.

177.130.
Hearing — Order — Plans, specifications, and estimates of cost.

If the department finds that a crossing proposed for vacation should be replaced with another grade crossing or a grade separation, it shall give at least ten (10) days’ notice by certified mail, return receipt requested, to the railroad company and to the chief executive officer of the affected unit of local government of a public hearing to be held at a time and place stated in the notice. At the public hearing, the department shall consider whether or not the proposed grade separation or substitute crossing is reasonably necessary and the most advantageous method of enhancing the public convenience and necessity. If the department finds that the grade separation or substitute crossing is reasonably necessary, it shall make an order to that effect and furnish a copy thereof by certified mail, return receipt requested, to the railroad company and to the chief executive officer of the affected unit of local government. The order shall specify the location of the crossing to be substituted and whether it shall pass over or under the railroad tracks or intersect them at grade, the width of the crossing, and the angle at which the crossing shall meet and converge into the roadbed on either side of the railroad tracks. The order may direct the railroad company to prepare plans, specifications, and estimates of cost for the grade separation or substitute crossing in accordance with the general plan prescribed by the order. The order may provide that the plans, specifications, and estimates of cost shall be prepared by the department.

History.

4356z-2: amend. Acts 1974, ch. 74, Art. IV, § 20(1); 1974, ch. 315, § 21; 1980, ch. 114, § 29, effective July 15, 1980; 1992, ch. 229, § 7, effective July 14, 1992; 1996, ch. 318, § 61, effective July 15, 1996.

177.140.
Railroad company to present plans and estimates of cost.

Within ninety (90) days after the entry of an order directing a grade separation or change, and the preparation of plans, specifications, and estimates of cost by the railroad company, the railroad company shall present to the department plans, specifications, and estimates of cost for the grade separation or change, including the necessary approaches thereto.

History.

4356z-3.

177.150.
Final hearing — Notice — Final order — Waiver of proceedings — Appeal.

After receipt of the plans, specifications, and estimates of cost from the railroad company, the department shall give at least ten (10) days’ notice by certified mail, return receipt requested, to the railroad company of a time and place for a conference with respect to the grade separation or change. If the department elects to prepare plans, specifications, and estimates of cost, it shall furnish copies thereof to the railroad company prior to or at the time it gives notice of the conference. At the conference, the department shall approve or modify the plans and specifications and shall consider and determine the method of doing the work, whether by the railroad company or by the department, or partly by one and partly by the other, and whether by contract or by the employees of the department or the railroad company, or both, or by any combination of these methods, and if by contract, the method and manner of advertising for bids, the time and place of opening the bids, the time when work shall be begun and completed, and all similar matters of an administrative nature. The department shall embody its conclusions in an order, a copy of which shall be sent by certified mail, return receipt requested, to the railroad company.

The department and any railroad company may agree by contract as to the method of eliminating any grade crossing or changing any existing overhead or underpass structure. In event of an agreement, all notices, hearings, and proceedings shall be deemed to have been waived, and the work of eliminating the grade crossing or making the change shall be performed in accordance with the terms of the contract, with the same effect as though the work was being performed pursuant to a final order of the department.

Any person aggrieved by an order issued pursuant to subsection (1) of this section may appeal to the department, and upon appeal an administrative hearing shall be conducted in accordance with KRS Chapter 13B.

History.

4356z-4: amend. Acts 1974, ch. 74, Art. IV, § 20(1); 1974, ch. 315, § 22; 1980, ch. 114, § 30, effective July 15, 1980; 1996, ch. 318, § 62, effective July 15, 1996.

177.160.
Rejection of bids — Department may do work.

The department may by supplemental orders reject or order the rejection of all bids submitted for the work, or any part thereof, and require a readvertisement for bids. The department may reject all bids and elect to do the work itself, or partly by itself and by the railroad company, or by contractors, or by a combination of these methods. If the department elects to do the work itself there shall not be charged to the railroad company any sum in excess of that it would have been required to pay had the contract been let to the lowest bidder.

In all cases where the work is let by the railroad company on contract, the work shall be done under the general supervision of the department.

History.

4356z-5.

177.170.
Division of costs — Payment.

The cost of preparing the plans, specifications and estimates of cost and of advertising for bids shall be paid wholly by the railroad company. The state shall pay one-half (1/2) of the cost of the work within the right-of-way lines of the railroad company, extended across the highway, and the railroad company shall pay the other one-half (1/2) of the cost of the work lying within said lines. The department shall pay the entire cost of all work lying beyond the right-of-way lines of the railroad.

As the work progresses the department shall furnish to the railroad company, and the railroad company shall furnish to the department, a monthly statement showing in detail all amounts expended in connection with the work. On or about the fifteenth of each month the state highway engineer shall prepare a statement showing the total amount expended to the close of the preceding month, the amount paid or expended by each party up to that time, and the amount due from the department to the railroad company or from the railroad company to the department. Upon receipt of the statement each party shall pay to the other the amounts shown to be due thereby.

All payments made on such monthly statements shall be considered only payments on account, and upon final completion of the work the state highway engineer shall prepare and furnish to the railroad company a statement showing the total cost of the work, the amount paid or expended by the department or the railroad company, and the amount due from one to the other. Each party shall be afforded reasonable opportunities to verify the statements of expenditures by the other, and the balance due as certified by the state highway engineer in his final statement shall be paid by one (1) party to the other promptly upon receipt of such final statement.

The work lying within the right-of-way of the railroad shall be maintained at the expense of the railroad company, but the railroad company shall not be required to keep up the surface of the roadbed of the highway.

History.

4356z-6; 4356z-11.

Research References and Practice Aids

ALR

Constitutional power to compel railroad company to relocate or reconstruct highway crossing or to pay or contribute to expense thereof. 55 A.L.R. 660; 62 A.L.R. 815; 109 A.L.R. 768.

177.180.
Highway engineer to approve contracts.

All contracts let by the railroad company under KRS

177.120

to

177.210

shall have the approval of the state highway engineer, in writing, indorsed on the contract.

History.

4356z-8.

177.190.
Appeal by railroad company to Circuit Court.

Any railroad company dissatisfied with a final order of the department directing the elimination of any grade crossing or change of existing overhead or underpass structure, or any order modifying or amending the final order may appeal by filing a petition in the clerk’s office of the Franklin Circuit Court in accordance with KRS Chapter 13B.

On the hearing of the appeal, the Circuit Court shall determine whether the elimination of the grade crossing, or the change in existing overhead or underpass structure, is reasonably necessary for the safety of the traveling public, and whether the plans and specifications prescribed by the order of the department are reasonably adequate to provide safety of operation for the trains of the railroad company, its employees and the public, and make reasonably adequate provisions for the future development of the railroad company’s facilities.

If the court finds from the evidence that the elimination of the grade crossing or change in existing overhead or underpass structure is not reasonably necessary for the safety of the traveling public, it shall, by final judgment, enjoin the department from enforcing its final order.

If the court finds from the evidence that the elimination of the grade crossing or change in existing overhead or underpass structure is reasonably necessary for the safety of the traveling public, it shall, by final judgment, either order the railroad company to proceed with the work in accordance with the final order of the department, or in accordance with other plans and specifications prescribed by the court.

History.

4356z-7: amend. Acts 1974, ch. 74, Art. IV, § 20(1); 1976, ch. 62, § 93; 1996, ch. 318, § 63, effective July 15, 1996.

177.200.
Appeal to Court of Appeals.

Either the department or the railroad company affected by the final judgment of the Circuit Court may appeal to the Court of Appeals in accordance with the Rules of Civil Procedure.

History.

4356z-7: amend. Acts 1960, ch. 104, § 11; 1974, ch. 74, Art. IV, § 20(1); 1976, ch. 62, § 94.

177.210.
Department may bring action to enforce order.

If any railroad company fails to comply with any order of the department issued under authority of KRS

177.120

to

177.210

, the department may cause to be instituted in the Franklin Circuit Court, in the name of the state, an action to compel compliance with the order by mandatory process of the court.

History.

4356z-12.